Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,152
State-certified seeds; certification agencies; legal obligations; University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources not liable.

The University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall not be financially responsible for debts incurred by, damages inflicted by, or contracts broken by certifying agencies in conducting certification work.

Laws 1931, c. 151, § 4, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1819;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,152;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 56.